Hawaii statutes.
§321-352 Early intervention services for
infants and toddlers with special needs. The department may develop a
statewide, coordinated, multidisciplinary program which contains a continuum of
services to meet the needs of infants and toddlers with special needs. The
department shall be the lead agency for the coordination of federal and state
funding for those programs. Pursuant to chapter 103F, the department may
purchase services appropriate to carry out activities under this part. [L 1989,
c 107, pt of §2; am L 1991, c 335, §7; am L 1997, c 190, §6]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next